Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0945.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 351. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund is created to assist in stabilizing revenue and employment during periods of economic recession and high unemployment. Funds deposited into the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund must be available for distribution by not later than January 1 of the calendar year following the deposit. (2) By not later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, the state treasurer shall deposit into the child care payment fund, and make available for distribution, money from the interest accrued from the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund from the fiscal year ending September 30, 2024 to the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence. Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, all interest from fund investments from the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund must be deposited into the child care payment fund. (3) As used in this section, "child care payment fund" means the child care payment fund created in section 13b of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.123b. (4) (2) As used in this section and sections 352 to 359, "fund" means the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund. (5) (3) As used in section 352, "current calendar year" means the year that ends December 31 in which the determination of the transfer into or out of the fund is being made. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 946 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.